Maryland, session 2025, SB0162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–901 through 10–909 and the subtitle “Subtitle 9. Cantaloupes” of
Article – Agriculture of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 1 –